Utah statutes.
76-10-1009.   Violation as unfair trade practice and unfair competition --
Investigation and enforcement proceedings by trade commission.
Violation of a provision of this part is hereby declared to be an unfair trade
practice and an unfair method of competition. The Utah state trade commission
shall have jurisdiction over violations and may proceed against a violator as
provided by the trade commission act. The trade commission may institute an
investigation upon receiving an informal complaint from a person who claims to
have been injured by the violation of this part. Upon receiving a sworn
complaint from a person claiming to be injured by a violation of this part,
the trade commission must institute an investigation. If evidence of a
violation is found by the commission or is produced by the complainant, the
commission must take appropriate enforcement proceedings as provided in the
trade commission act.
